Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1873, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 88, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1873), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1873. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2025, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Board of Licensed Alcohol and Drug
Counselors, consisting of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the
Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, as follows:
1. a. Six members who shall be alcohol and drug counselors
certified by an entity recognized to do professional
alcohol and drug counseling certification in this
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1040 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

state; provided, however, five of such members shall
subsequently secure licensure and one such member
shall subsequently secure certification, pursuant to
the provisions of the Licensed Alcohol and Drug
Counselors Act, no later than January 1, 2005.
b. Thereafter, five members shall be licensed alcohol and
drug counselors at the time of appointment, and one
member shall be certified as an alcohol and drug
counselor at the time of appointment.
c. Pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph, the
Governor shall appoint:
(1) four members from a list of names submitted by
the Oklahoma Drug and Alcohol Professional
Counselors Association,
(2) one member from a list of names submitted by the
Oklahoma Substance Abuse Services Alliance, and
(3) one member from a list of names submitted by the
Oklahoma Citizen Advocates for Recovery and
Treatment Association
In selecting appointees, the Governor may consider
recommendations from a statewide organization
representing alcohol and drug counselors, a state
chapter of a national organization representing
alcohol and drug counselors, a statewide organization
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1040 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

representing individuals in recovery, or other groups
or individuals in this state.
d. One member shall be appointed from and shall represent
the general public. Such member shall be a resident
of this state who has attained the age of majority and
shall not be, nor shall ever have been, a licensed or
certified alcohol and drug counselor, or the spouse of
a licensed or certified alcohol and drug counselor, or
a person who has ever had any material financial
interest in the provision of alcohol and drug
counseling services or has engaged in any activity
directly related to the practice of alcohol and drug
counseling.
2. The composition of the Board shall include five members who
hold a master’s or higher degree and one member whose highest degree
held is a bachelor’s degree.
3. The Governor shall appoint the members to the Board no later
than July 1, 2004.
B. Each member of the Board appointed as a licensed alcohol and
drug counselor shall:
1. Be certified or licensed to engage in the practice of
alcohol and drug counseling in this state and shall be in good
standing; and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1040 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Have at least three (3) years of experience in the practice
of alcohol and drug counseling in this state.
C. Two of the members initially appointed shall serve three-
year terms; two shall serve four-year terms and three shall serve
five-year terms, as designated by the Governor. Thereafter, the
terms of all members shall be five (5) years.
D. A vacancy on the Board shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.
Members may succeed themselves but shall serve no more than two
consecutive terms. Each member shall serve until a successor is
appointed and qualified.
E. Members of the Board may be removed from office for one or
more of the following reasons:
1. The refusal or inability for any reason to perform the
duties of a Board member in an efficient, responsible and
professional manner;
2. The misuse of office for pecuniary or material gain or for
personal advantage for self or another;
3. A violation of the laws or rules governing the practice of
alcohol and drug counseling; or
4. Conviction of a felony as verified by a certified copy of
the record of the court of conviction.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1040 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. Members of the Board shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses as
provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
February 24, 2025 - DO PASS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1040 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)